Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 4 Exemptions and Liabilities of Members

22-4-1.
Warrants to compel attendance.

The attendance of senators elect and representatives elect, and of senators and representatives, may be compelled by warrant for that purpose under the hand of the presiding officer for the time being of the senate or house of representatives, as the case may be, directed to any deputy sheriff, which warrant may be executed by that officer in any county.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 31; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 33; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

22-4-1

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 51.

22-4-2.
Exemption from process.

The person of every member of the general assembly shall be exempt from arrest, and his or her estate from attachment, in any civil action, during the session of the general assembly, and two (2) days before the commencement and two (2) days after the termination of the session; and all process served contrary to this section shall be void.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 600; G.L. 1909, ch. 302, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 352, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 304, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-4-2

.

22-4-3.
Repealed.